Florida, session 2026, SB876.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 394.464, Florida Statutes, is amended to 23 read: 24 394.464âCourt proceedings and records; confidentiality.â 25 (1)âAbsent the respondentâs consent or a finding of good 26 cause by a judge or an administrative law judge, all hearings 27 conducted under this part are confidential and closed to the 28 public. 29 (2)(a)âThe respondentâs name, at a hearing or on appeal, 30 and all petitions or applications for voluntary and involuntary 31 admission for mental health examination or treatment, court 32 orders, and related records that are filed with or by a court 33 under this part are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) 34 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. Pleadings and 35 other documents made confidential and exempt by this section may 36 be disclosed by the clerk of the court, upon request, to any of 37 the following: 38 1.(a)âThe petitioner. 39 2.(b)âThe petitionerâs attorney. 40 3.(c)âThe respondent. 41 4.(d)âThe respondentâs attorney. 42 5.(e)âThe respondentâs guardian or guardian advocate, if 43 applicable. 44 6.(f)âIn the case of a minor respondent, the respondentâs 45 parent, guardian, legal custodian, or guardian advocate. 46 7.(g)âThe respondentâs treating health care practitioner 47 and service provider. 48 8.(h)âThe respondentâs health care surrogate or proxy. 49 9.(i)âThe Department of Children and Families, without 50 charge. 51 10.(j)âThe Department of Corrections, without charge, if 52 the respondent is committed or is to be returned to the custody 53 of the Department of Corrections from the Department of Children 54 and Families. 55 11.(k)âA person or an entity authorized to view records 56 upon a court order for good cause. In determining whether if 57 there is good cause for the disclosure of records, the court 58 shall must weigh the personâs person or entityâs need for the 59 information against potential harm to the respondent from the 60 disclosure. 61 (b)(2)âThis subsection section does not preclude the clerk 62 of the court from submitting the information required by s. 63 790.065 to the Department of Law Enforcement. 64 (c)(3)âThe clerk of the court may not publish personal 65 identifying information on a court docket or in a publicly 66 accessible file, but the court may use the respondentâs name to 67 schedule and adjudicate cases, including the transmission of any 68 court order to the parties or the service provider. 69 (d)(4)âA person or an entity receiving information pursuant 70 to this subsection section shall maintain that information as 71 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 72 of the State Constitution. 73 (e)(5)âThe exemption under this subsection section applies 74 to all documents filed with a court before, on, or after July 1, 75 2019, and appeals pending or filed on or after July 1, 2026. 76 (f)âThis subsection applies to records held by the Division 77 of Administrative Hearings to the same extent as records held by 78 a court. 79 (g)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 80 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 81 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 82 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 83 Section 2.âSection 397.6760, Florida Statutes, is amended 84 to read: 85 397.6760âCourt proceedings and records; confidentiality.â 86 (1)âAbsent a judicial finding of good cause or the 87 respondentâs consent, all hearings under this part or part IV 88 are confidential and closed to the public. 89 (2)(a)âThe respondentâs name, at trial and on appeal, and 90 all petitions or applications for voluntary and involuntary 91 substance abuse treatment or assessment and stabilization, court 92 orders, and related records that are filed with or by a court 93 under this part or part IV are confidential and exempt from s. 94 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 95 Pleadings and other documents made confidential and exempt by 96 this section may be disclosed by the clerk of the court, upon 97 request, to any of the following: 98 1.(a)âThe petitioner. 99 2.(b)âThe petitionerâs attorney. 100 3.(c)âThe respondent. 101 4.(d)âThe respondentâs attorney. 102 5.(e)âThe respondentâs guardian or guardian advocate, if 103 applicable. 104 6.(f)âIn the case of a minor respondent, the respondentâs 105 parent, guardian, legal custodian, or guardian advocate. 106 7.(g)âThe respondentâs treating health care practitioner 107 and service provider. 108 8.(h)âThe respondentâs health care surrogate or proxy. 109 9.(i)âThe Department of Children and Families, without 110 charge. 111 10.(j)âThe Department of Corrections, without charge, if 112 the respondent is committed or is to be returned to the custody 113 of the Department of Corrections from the Department of Children 114 and Families. 115 11.(k)âA person or an entity authorized to view records 116 upon a court order for good cause. In determining whether if 117 there is good cause for the disclosure of records, the court 118 shall must weigh the personâs person or entityâs need for the 119 information against potential harm to the respondent from the 120 disclosure. 121 (b)(2)âThis subsection section does not preclude the clerk 122 of the court from submitting the information required by s. 123 790.065 to the Department of Law Enforcement. 124 (c)(3)âThe clerk of the court may not publish personal 125 identifying information on a court docket or in a publicly 126 accessible file, but the court may use the respondentâs name to 127 schedule and adjudicate cases, including the transmission of any 128 court order to the parties or the service provider. 129 (d)(4)âA person or an entity receiving information pursuant 130 to this subsection section shall maintain that information as 131 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 132 of the State Constitution. 133 (e)(5)âThe exemption under this subsection section applies 134 to all documents filed with a court before, on, or after July 1, 135 2017, and appeals pending or filed on or after July 1, 2026. 136 (f)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 137 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 138 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 139 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 140 Section 3.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 141 necessity that court hearings under part I of chapter 394 and 142 part IV or part V of chapter 397, Florida Statutes, be made 143 confidential and closed to the public unless the court finds 144 good cause to open a hearing to the public or the respondent 145 consents to a hearing being open to the public. A personâs 146 mental health or substance use disorders are medical conditions 147 that should be protected from public disclosure. A personâs 148 health and sensitive personal information regarding his or her 149 mental health or substance use disorders are intensely private 150 matters. Making hearings confidential and closed to the public 151 when such disorders, conditions, and personal information may be 152 communicated will protect such persons from the release of 153 sensitive personal information that could damage their and their 154 familiesâ reputations. Allowing public hearings relating to such 155 information defeats the purpose of protections otherwise 156 provided. Further, the knowledge that such sensitive personal 157 information is subject to disclosure could have a chilling 158 effect on a personâs willingness to seek out and comply with 159 mental health or substance abuse treatment services. 160 (2)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public necessity 161 that voluntary applications or petitions for involuntary 162 examination or treatment, court orders, and related records that 163 are filed with or by a court or relevant service provider under 164 part I of chapter 394 and part IV or part V of chapter 397, 165 Florida Statutes, and the personal identifying information of a 166 person with a potential mental, emotional, or behavioral 167 disorder or a substance use disorder which is published on a 168 court docket and maintained by the clerk of the court under part 169 I of chapter 394 and part IV or part V of chapter 397, Florida 170 Statutes, or with the relevant service provider be made 171 confidential and exempt from disclosure under s. 119.07(1), 172 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 173 Constitution. The mental health or substance use disorders of a 174 person are medical conditions that should be protected from 175 public disclosure. A personâs health and sensitive personal 176 information regarding his or her mental health or substance use 177 disorders are intensely private matters. Making such 178 applications, petitions, orders, records, and personal 179 identifying information confidential and exempt from disclosure 180 will protect such persons from the release of sensitive personal 181 information that could damage their and their familiesâ 182 reputations. The publication of personal identifying information 183 on a physical or virtual docket, regardless of whether any other 184 record is published, defeats the purpose of protections 185 otherwise provided. Further, the knowledge that such sensitive 186 personal information is subject to disclosure could have a 187 chilling effect on a personâs willingness to seek out and comply 188 with mental health or substance abuse treatment services. 189 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.